Louisiana, session 2026, SB102.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:1253.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1253.1. Private right of action; association standing
A. A trade association may bring an action or intervene in an action in
its own name or on behalf of one or more of its members as provided in
Subsection B of this Section, if it meets all of the following conditions:
(1) It is primarily comprised of and controlled by a minimum of one
hundred licensed motor vehicle dealers.
(2) A minimum of one of its members holds a valid license under this
Chapter and has standing to sue or intervene individually.
(3) The interests the association seeks to protect are germane to its
purpose.
(4) Neither the claim asserted nor the relief requested requires the
participation of individual members.
B. A trade association prevailing pursuant to this Section may be granted
any of the following remedies:
(1) Declaratory relief.
(2) Injunctive relief.
(3) Reasonable costs and attorney fees.
C. An action by a trade association pursuant to this Section may be
brought before the commission or in any district court of competent
jurisdiction.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 102 ENROLLED
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.